Wisconsin, session 2025, AB151.
do enact as follows:AB151,11Section 1. 767.41 (4) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB151,2,122767.41 (4) (a) 2. In determining the allocation of periods of physical 3placement, the court shall consider each case on the basis of the factors in sub. (5) 4(am), subject to sub. (5) (bm). The court shall set presume that a placement 5schedule that allows the child to have regularly occurring, meaningful periods of 6physical placement with each parent and that maximizes equalizes to the highest 7degree the amount of time the child may spend with each parent, taking into 8account geographic separation and accommodations for different households is in 9the best interest of the child. The presumption under this subdivision is rebutted if 10the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence, after considering all of the 11factors in sub. (5) (am), subject to sub. (5) (bm), that equalizing physical placement 12to the highest degree is not in the child’s best interest.AB151,213Section 2. 767.41 (5) (am) 5m. of the statutes is created to read:AB151,2,1414767.41 (5) (am) 5m. The geographic separation of the parties.AB151,315Section 3. Initial applicability.AB151,2,1716(1) This act first applies to actions or proceedings that are commenced on the 17effective date of this subsection.AB151,2,1818